District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.02

Fire safety.

An ALR shall comply with the Life Safety Code of the National Fire Protection Association, NFPA 101, 1997 edition as follows:

(1)

An ALR shall be in compliance with Chapter 22, New Residential Board and Care Occupancies, Life Safety Code of the National Fire Protection Association; and

(2)

An existing community residence facility that is converting to an ALR shall be in compliance with Chapter 23, Existing Residential Board and Care Occupancies, of the Life Safety Code of the National Fire Protection Association.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1002, 47 DCR 2647